Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2305
Appeal; printing of record; cost paid by county.

In civil or criminal cases in which a party is permitted to proceed in forma pauperis, the court shall direct that the expenses of printing the record on appeal, if such printing is required by the appellate court, be paid by the county in the same manner as other claims are paid.

Laws 1972, LB 1120, § 5;

Laws 1999, LB 689, § 8.

To be effective, a poverty affidavit must show on its face, by the certificate of an authorized officer before whom it is taken, evidence that it was duly sworn to by the party making the affidavit. State v. Hunter, 234 Neb. 567, 451 N.W.2d 922 (1990).